Utah statutes.
17D-2-301.   Project plans and specifications.

Each local building authority that proposes to construct, acquire, improve, or extend a project for the use of its creating local entity shall submit to the governing body of the creating local entity:

(1)  plans and specifications for the project; and

(2)  the estimated project costs.

